Hawaii statutes.
§431:21-113 Appeals. Any
applicant or member insurer affected by a decision of the association shall
have the right to appeal to the board of directors within thirty days after the
decision. The application for appeal shall specify in what respects the person
making the appeal was aggrieved and the grounds to be relied upon as a basis
for the relief demanded. The board of directors shall hold the hearing within
thirty days after the board of directors' receipt of the application for appeal
unless postponed by mutual consent.

Any final action or order of the board of
directors shall be subject to judicial review by the circuit court of the first
judicial circuit. [L 1991, c 284, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 143, §6]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next